Florida, session 2026, SB934.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 18 196.1978, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 19 196.1978âAffordable housing property exemption.â 20 (3) 21 (b)âNotwithstanding ss. 196.195 and 196.196, portions of 22 property in a multifamily project are considered property used 23 for a charitable purpose and are eligible to receive an ad 24 valorem property tax exemption if such portions meet all of the 25 following conditions: 26 1.âProvide affordable housing to natural persons or 27 families meeting the income limitations provided in paragraph 28 (d). 29 2.a.âAre within a newly constructed multifamily project 30 that contains more than 70 units dedicated to housing natural 31 persons or families meeting the income limitations provided in 32 paragraph (d); or 33 b.âOne or more units are located within a newly constructed 34 multifamily project in an area of critical state concern, as 35 designated by s. 380.0552 or chapter 28-36, Florida 36 Administrative Code, and are which contains more than 10 units 37 dedicated to housing natural persons or families meeting the 38 income limitations provided in paragraph (d). 39 3.âAre rented for an amount that does not exceed the amount 40 as specified by the most recent multifamily rental programs 41 income and rent limit chart posted by the corporation and 42 derived from the Multifamily Tax Subsidy Projects Income Limits 43 published by the United States Department of Housing and Urban 44 Development or 90 percent of the fair market value rent as 45 determined by a rental market study meeting the requirements of 46 paragraph (l), whichever is less. 47 Section 2.âParagraph (h) is added to subsection (1) of 48 section 255.05, Florida Statutes, to read: 49 255.05âBond of contractor constructing public buildings; 50 form; action by claimants.â 51 (1)âA person entering into a formal contract with the state 52 or any county, city, or political subdivision thereof, or other 53 public authority or private entity, for the construction of a 54 public building, for the prosecution and completion of a public 55 work, or for repairs upon a public building or public work shall 56 be required, before commencing the work or before recommencing 57 the work after a default or abandonment, to execute and record 58 in the public records of the county where the improvement is 59 located, a payment and performance bond with a surety insurer 60 authorized to do business in this state as surety. A public 61 entity may not require a contractor to secure a surety bond 62 under this section from a specific agent or bonding company. 63 (h)âA person may be exempted from executing the payment and 64 performance bond required under this subsection if the following 65 conditions are met: 66 1.âThe work is done on property located within an area of 67 critical state concern which is subject to a long-term ground 68 lease of 99 years or more with Habitat for Humanity 69 International, Inc., or any of its local affiliates, at the 70 discretion of the official or board that owns the subject 71 underlying property in fee simple. 72 2.âThe leasehold interest created by the ground lease of 99 73 years or more is subject to any claims by claimants who are 74 lienors as defined in s. 713.01 and applicable lien provisions 75 in chapter 713. The underlying real property owned by the state, 76 or any county, city, or political subdivision thereof, or other 77 public authority is not subject to any lien rights created under 78 chapter 713. 79 Section 3.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 80 259.105, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 81 259.105âThe Florida Forever Act.â 82 (3)âLess the costs of issuing and the costs of funding 83 reserve accounts and other costs associated with bonds, the 84 proceeds of cash payments or bonds issued pursuant to this 85 section shall be deposited into the Florida Forever Trust Fund 86 created by s. 259.1051. The proceeds shall be distributed by the 87 Department of Environmental Protection in the following manner: 88 (b)âThirty-five percent to the Department of Environmental 89 Protection for the acquisition of lands and capital project 90 expenditures described in this section. Of the proceeds 91 distributed pursuant to this paragraph, it is the intent of the 92 Legislature that an increased priority be given to those 93 acquisitions which achieve a combination of conservation goals, 94 including protecting Floridaâs water resources and natural 95 groundwater recharge. At a minimum, 3 percent, and no more than 96 10 percent, of the funds allocated pursuant to this paragraph 97 shall be spent on capital project expenditures identified during 98 the time of acquisition which meet land management planning 99 activities necessary for public access. Beginning in the 2017 100 2018 fiscal year and continuing through the 2035-2036 2026-2027 101 fiscal year, at least $5 million of the funds allocated pursuant 102 to this paragraph shall be spent on land acquisition within the 103 Florida Keys Area of Critical State Concern as authorized 104 pursuant to s. 259.045. 105 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.